Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 4 Canal Companies

Cross references.

Corporations generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V and T. 14, C. 4.

52-4-1.
Filing of petition for incorporation; contents of petition; filing fee.

Any number of persons, not less than five, desiring to be incorporated as a company for the purpose of constructing, operating, and maintaining a canal, may file with the Secretary of State a petition setting out the names and domicile of the petitioners, that they desire to be incorporated as a canal company, the name under which they desire to be incorporated, the route as nearly as possible of the proposed canal, the headquarters of the corporation, the amount of the capital stock, and the number of shares into which divided and pay to the Secretary of State the fee provided for in Code Section 14-4-183.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1986; Civil Code 1910, § 2367; Code 1933, § 17-101.

Cross references.

Grant of corporate powers generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Fee for incorporation of canal company, §

14-4-183

.

Corporate powers to canal companies granted by Secretary of State, §

14-5-2

.

52-4-2.
Issuance of certificate of incorporation.

When the petition for incorporation has been made and filed and the fee paid, as provided in Code Section 52-4-1, the Secretary of State shall issue to the petitioners a certificate as follows:

“Georgia. To whom it may concern — Greetings:

_______________
having filed their petition in the terms of the law, praying to be incorporated as a canal company, they and their associates and successors are hereby declared to be a body corporate for the period of 30 years, under the name of
_______________ , with power to construct, maintain, and operate a canal in and through
_______________ , with such powers, privileges, and liabilities as may now or hereafter be prescribed by law.

Witness my official hand and seal of state, this
_______________
day of
_______________ ,
_______________ .”

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1987; Civil Code 1910, § 2368; Code 1933, § 17-102; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 52.

52-4-3.
Maintenance by Secretary of State of files and books regarding canal companies.

The Secretary of State shall keep on file all petitions for incorporation and transcripts from minutes provided for in this chapter and shall also keep a book in which shall be entered by him the name of the company, date of incorporation, amount of capital stock, location of principal office, and any increase or decrease of capital stock.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 12; Civil Code 1895, § 1998; Civil Code 1910, § 2379; Code 1933, § 17-103.

Cross references.

Reports of corporation, §

14-4-180

.

52-4-4.
Time of commencement of corporate existence; duration of corporate existence.

Upon the issuance of the certificate, the persons therein named, their associates, and their successors shall be and become a body corporate for the period provided for in Code Section 14-4-62.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1988; Civil Code 1910, § 2369; Code 1933, § 17-104.

52-4-5.
Petitioners as constituting first board of directors; election of officers; prescription of rules and bylaws; opening books of subscription for capital stock.

The petitioners shall constitute the first board of directors; they shall organize by electing one of their number president and such other officers as may be necessary, prescribe rules and bylaws, and open books of subscription for the capital stock.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1988; Civil Code 1910, § 2369; Code 1933, § 17-104.

52-4-6.
Publication of notice upon subscription for all of capital stock and payment of 10 percent thereof; authorization for commencing transaction of business; personal liability of directors and stockholders.

When all the capital stock has been subscribed for and 10 percent thereof paid in, notice of that fact shall be published three times in the public newspaper in which the sheriff’s sales are advertised in the county in which is situated the principal office of the corporation. When this has been done, the corporation is authorized to begin the transaction of business, but not before. The directors and stockholders of the corporation shall be personally liable for all obligations incurred prior to a compliance with the requirements provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1988; Civil Code 1910, § 2369; Code 1933, § 17-104.

Cross references.

Organization of corporation before capital stock subscribed for, §

14-4-63

.

52-4-7.
Location of principal office.

The principal office of all companies incorporated as provided in this chapter shall always be in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 11; Civil Code 1895, § 1997; Civil Code 1910, § 2378; Code 1933, § 17-105.

52-4-8.
Powers and duties of companies generally.

All companies incorporated under this chapter shall have power to bring or be the subject of actions; make contracts; lease, purchase, hold, and sell such property, real and personal, as may be necessary for the purposes of the corporation; and construct and maintain a canal and branch canals, dams, races, weirs, aqueducts, reservoirs, towpaths, and all other appliances necessary to divert, take, or use the waters of any stream or body of water. However, the canal companies shall not, by building any dam in or across or by diverting water from any navigable stream, destroy or obstruct the navigation of such stream. Such fishways shall be placed in any dams at the time of the construction of the dam as the commissioner of natural resources shall direct. Fishways shall be kept in good order and repair by the canal company, and the company shall notify the commissioner of natural resources of the proposed construction of any dam. Further, the canal companies shall pay reasonable compensation to such landholders as may have riparian rights in any stream or body of water taken, diverted, or obstructed for such taking, diversion, or obstruction or for any damage done them. The canal companies may also enter upon, take, and appropriate any lands and tenements necessary and appropriate for the purposes of the corporation upon first paying reasonable compensation therefor. No company incorporated as provided in this chapter shall have power to construct or use any canal within the corporate limits of any incorporated municipality without first obtaining the consent of the proper corporate authorities of such municipality.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 1989; Civil Code 1910, § 2370; Code 1933, § 17-106.

Cross references.

Additional powers possessed by corporations organized under this chapter, §§

14-4-60

and

14-4-61

.

52-4-9.
Right of corporation to increase or decrease capital stock.

All companies incorporated under this chapter may increase or decrease their capital stock in the manner provided in Code Sections 14-4-120 and 14-4-121.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 10; Civil Code 1895, § 1996; Civil Code 1910, § 2377; Code 1933, § 17-107.

Cross references.

Change in capital stock of corporations, §§

14-4-120

and

14-4-121

.

52-4-10.
Power of companies to enlarge works and appliances of canals and branch canals and to deepen and widen canals.

Any company incorporated under this chapter is authorized to enlarge any of the works or appliances of a canal or branch canals and enlarge a canal anywhere along the line of the same by deepening and widening it, making basins, dams, reservoirs, or otherwise. Any such company is also authorized to construct and build branch canals to and from a canal from any and all points, with the same privileges and rights as are granted in constructing the main canal and other works, and to construct any dams, races, waste-weirs, weirs, towpaths, and other structures to improve and make available a canal or canals under the limitations already set out in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 1991; Civil Code 1910, § 2372; Code 1933, § 17-108.

52-4-11.
Furnishing of canal water by canal companies; charges for use of water.

Any canal company incorporated as provided in this chapter is authorized to allow water to be drawn from its canal for the purpose of propelling machinery, irrigating lands, furnishing water for drinking or fighting fire, or any other purpose that the board of directors may deem proper at any points along the line of the canal and charge for the use of the water.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 6; Civil Code 1895, § 1992; Civil Code 1910, § 2373; Code 1933, § 17-109.

52-4-12.
Toll rates for use of canals.

All companies incorporated as provided in this chapter may permit all goods, lumber, rafts of every description, vessels of every kind, and all other things that can be transported to be conveyed through their canals and may collect such tolls as they may deem proper therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 1993; Civil Code 1910, § 2374; Code 1933, § 17-110.

52-4-13.
Encroachment of canals upon public roads; construction and maintenance of bridges.

Whenever any canal or backwaters of any company incorporated as provided in this chapter shall encroach upon or cross any public road, the company shall restore the road to a condition suitable for use by the public, by bridges or otherwise. All bridges constructed under this Code section shall be built and maintained in good order at the expense of the canal company.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 1994; Civil Code 1910, § 2375; Code 1933, § 17-111.

52-4-14.
Mortgage, sale, or lease of canal, other properties, corporate rights, and franchises.

Companies incorporated under this chapter may mortgage, sell, or lease their canal and other properties, corporate rights, and franchises to any person or corporation to obtain money to purchase, construct, or maintain their works and franchises.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 9; Civil Code 1895, § 1995; Civil Code 1910, § 2376; Code 1933, § 17-112.

52-4-15.
Disagreements as to compensation for taking of lands, tenements, or riparian rights pursuant to chapter.

When any person or corporation shall feel aggrieved or damaged by any appropriation to the use of the company of any of his or their lands, tenements, or riparian rights and cannot agree with the company as to the amount of damage, the amount shall be ascertained as provided in Title 22.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 1990; Civil Code 1910, § 2371; Code 1933, § 17-113.

52-4-16.
Taxes applicable to canal companies.

The corporations named in this chapter shall be subject to state, county, and municipal taxation.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 81, § 13; Civil Code 1895, § 1999; Civil Code 1910, § 2380; Code 1933, § 17-114.